Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1906
Terms, defined.

(1) The word witness as used in sections 29-1906 to 29-1911 shall include a person whose testimony is desired in any proceeding or investigation by a grand jury or in a criminal action, prosecution or proceeding; (2) the word state shall include any territory of the United States and the District of Columbia; (3) the word summons shall include a subpoena, order or other notice requiring the appearance of a witness.

Laws 1937, c. 71, § 1, p. 257;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-1906;

R.S.1943, § 29-1906.